Massachusetts, session 194th, H1428.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 19 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the ninth paragraph the following
paragraph:-
The program shall provide tuition and fee waivers for any resident of the commonwealth
who has been the subject of a legal guardianship pursuant to section 5-201 of chapter 190B of
the General Laws and who, upon reaching the age of 18 or upon enrolling in a Massachusetts
institution of higher education, is living with a grandparent or other relative, including any
person related by consanguinity, marriage or affinity except for a parent. The commonwealth,
not the institutions of public higher education, shall bear the cost of these waivers after all
reimbursements from the federal government have been exhausted.
of 1